Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 3

Management

54-12-301. Directors to be appointed for district — Qualifications — Terms — Duties and powers.

After a road improvement district has been located and established as provided for by parts 1 and 2 of this chapter, the monthly county court shall appoint two (2) directors for the district.

The directors shall be owners of land, or interested in land, in the district, and at least one (1) of those first appointed shall be one (1) of the petitioners for the establishment of the district, or a successor of that petitioner in estate or interest.

The directors shall hold their offices for two (2) years from the date of appointment, and these two (2) thus appointed and their successors, together with the county mayor, shall constitute the directors, or board of directors, of the district.

The directors shall have the general control, management and supervision of the business affairs of the district, and be vested with power and authority to make contracts, as provided by this chapter, and for all improvements to be done in the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 68; Shan. Supp., § 1682a82; Code 1932, § 2896; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1501; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Engineer employed to supervise construction of improvement work, § 54-12-311.

Road improvement overseer, employment, § 54-12-318.

Collateral References. Highways
90 et seq.

54-12-302. Vacancy, filling — Removal of director — Appeal from order of removal — Appeal bond — Hearing anew in circuit court — Appointment of another.

If there is a vacancy in the office of the director appointed pursuant to § 54-12-301 because of death, resignation or any other reason, the monthly county court shall appoint another director of like qualifications to fill the vacancy until the end of the two-year term.

For sufficient reason, the monthly county court may remove an appointed director, but not until the director has had at least five-days' notice of the time of the hearing and of the grounds for removal as alleged, and the director shall thus be entitled to be heard and to introduce proof upon the issue as to whether removal should be undertaken.

If, on hearing, the decision of the monthly county court is that the director be removed, the director may appeal from the decision, upon giving proper cost bond, to the circuit court of the county where the matter shall be heard anew and judgment given as that court deems just and proper.

If a director is removed, the monthly county court shall appoint another to serve the remainder of the two-year term, having like qualifications as to ownership of lands, etc., as provided in § 54-12-301.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 69; Shan. Supp., § 1682a83; Code 1932, § 2897; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1502.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-303. Successors of directors — Appointment.

At the end of each two-year term, the office of the two (2) appointed directors shall be again filled by appointment by the monthly county court from among those owning or interested in lands in the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 70; Shan. Supp., § 1682a84; Code 1932, § 2898; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1503.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-304. Organization of board — Bond of treasurer.

The county mayor shall be chair of the board of directors.

The board shall elect one (1) of the other directors secretary and treasurer of the board, and as the treasurer shall give bond in the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) faithfully to account for all money received as treasurer.

The bond shall be approved by the monthly county court and payable to the county or state, for the use of the district, and shall be recorded in the record.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 71; Shan. Supp., § 1682a85; Code 1932, § 2899; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1504; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-305. Compensation and expenses of directors.

The members of the board of directors shall receive as compensation for their services, in attending to their duties as directors, fifty cents (50¢) per hour for the time actually consumed in attending to their duties, but not to exceed twenty-five (25) hours in any one (1) month.

They shall also receive their actual expenses paid out or incurred on account of attending to their duties as directors. The account for time and expense shall be kept, made out and sworn to, and filed with the county clerk before payment is made.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 113; Shan. Supp., § 1682a127; Code 1932, § 2942; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1505; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-306. Contracts for improvements not to be made until after inspection, classifications, apportionment, and assessment of benefits.

No contracts for improvements to be done in the road improvement district shall be made until after the commissioners provided for by part 2 of this chapter have made their inspection, classifications, and apportionment as directed in part 2 of this chapter, nor until the questions of classification and apportionment and assessment of benefits have been determined and settled by the monthly county court.

After the commissioners and the court have so acted, then the contracts may be made by the board of directors of the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 72; Shan. Supp., § 1682a86; Code 1932, § 2900; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1506.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-307. Publication of notice of letting work of construction or improvement.

Before entering into any contract for improvements, the board of directors of the improvement district shall cause notice to be given once a week for four (4) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which the improvement is located, and additional publication elsewhere as the board may direct at the time and place of letting the work of construction of the improvement.

In the notice, the board shall specify the approximate amount of work to be done in each section, and the time fixed for the commencement and completion of the work.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 73; Shan. Supp., § 1682a87; Code 1932, § 2901; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1507.

54-12-308. Contracts for sections of work or the whole may be let to the lowest bidder — Rejection of bids and readvertisement.

The board of directors shall award a contract or contracts for each section of the work to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders, or may award the contract as a whole to the lowest responsible bidder, exercising its own discretion as to the letting of the work as a whole or in sections, and reserving the right to reject any and all bids and readvertise the letting of the work.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 74; Shan. Supp., § 1682a88; Code 1932, § 2902; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1508.

Collateral References.

Labor conditions or relations as factor in determining whether public contract should be let to lowest bidder. 110 A.L.R. 1406.

Mandamus to compel consideration, acceptance or rejection of bids. 80 A.L.R. 1382.

Right or duty of public authorities to require single bid or to let single contract for entire improvement or for two or more separate improvements. 123 A.L.R. 577.

Unit basis, right to require bid on, with reservation to public authorities of right to determine amount or extent of work. 79 A.L.R. 225.

Variation by bidder from specifications on bid for public work. 65 A.L.R. 835.

“Work,” what is covered by term, in statute as to letting public contracts to lowest bidder. 92 A.L.R. 835.

54-12-309. Deposit of bidders required.

Each person bidding for the work shall deposit with the treasurer of the board of directors in cash or certified check a sum equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount of the bid, not in any event, however, to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

The deposit shall be returned to the bidder if the bid is not successful, or, if successful, to be retained as a guarantee only of the bidder's good faith in entering into the contract.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 75; Shan. Supp., § 1682a89; Code 1932, § 2903; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1509.

54-12-310. Bond or cash deposit required of successful bidders.

The successful bidder shall be required to execute a bond, with sufficient sureties, payable to the county, for the use and benefit of the improvement district, in an amount equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the estimated cost of the work, so let or that amount may be deposited in cash with the treasurer of the board of directors as security for the performance of the contract, and upon the execution of the bond or the making of the deposit, the deposit originally made with the bid shall be returned.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 76; Shan. Supp., § 1682a90; Code 1932, § 2904; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1510.

Collateral References.

Public work, what constitutes, within statute relating to contractor's bond. 101 A.L.R. 565, 48 A.L.R.4th 1170.

State or local government's liability to subcontractors, laborers, or materialmen for failure to require general contractor to post bond. 54 A.L.R.5th 649.

Statutory condition prescribed for public contractor's bond as part of bond that does not in terms include it. 89 A.L.R. 446.

Statutory conditions effect of affirmative provision in public contractor's bond excluding. 47 A.L.R. 502, 89 A.L.R. 457.

54-12-311. Engineer employed to supervise construction of improvement work — Compensation — Removal, and contract with another.

The board of directors shall employ a competent engineer to have charge and supervision of the construction of the improvement work, contract for compensation for the engineer's services in a sum or at a rate that may be agreed upon, and to be paid as other expenses of the district.

The directors may remove the engineer and contract with another, if they see fit for any reason.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 77; Shan. Supp., § 1682a91; Code 1932, § 2905; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1511.

54-12-312. Bond required of engineer.

The board of directors shall require the engineer to give bond in a sum that it deems proper for the faithful performance of the engineer's duties, the bond to be payable to the county or state, for the use of the improvement district, and filed with the county clerk and recorded in the road improvement record.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 82; Shan. Supp., § 1682a96; Code 1932, § 2910; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1512.

54-12-313. Compensation of engineers.

An engineer employed by a board of directors of an improvement district to supervise the work, etc., shall be paid for services a salary or sums that may be agreed upon between the engineer and the board of directors.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 106; Shan. Supp., § 1682a120; Code 1932, § 2935; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1513.

54-12-314. Contractor paid on basis of eighty percent of engineer's monthly estimate of amount of work done.

The engineer in charge of the construction shall furnish to the contractor monthly estimates of the amount of work done on each section, and upon filing the estimates with the county clerk, the county mayor shall draw a warrant in favor of the contractor for eighty percent (80%) of the value of the work done according to the estimate.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 79; Shan. Supp., § 1682a93; Code 1932, § 2907; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1514; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-12-315. Warrant to contractor for balance due on completion of work.

When the work is completed to the satisfaction of the board of directors and the engineer, so certified by both, and the certificate is filed with the county clerk, then the county mayor shall draw a warrant in favor of the contractor for the balance due.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 80; Shan. Supp., § 1682a94; Code 1932, § 2908; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1515; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Collateral References.

Garnishment in respect of obligation to contractor under construction contract where certificate of performance has not been obtained. 82 A.L.R. 1124.

54-12-316. Warrants drawn as ordinary warrants, but payable only out of improvement fund, and so stated upon their face.

The warrants shall be drawn upon the county trustee or treasurer as ordinary county warrants are drawn, but shall be payable only out of the fund provided for the road improvement district, and shall so state upon their face.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 81; Shan. Supp., § 1682a95; Code 1932, § 2909; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1516.

54-12-317. Contractor's failure to perform on contract forfeits cash deposit or gives recovery on bond.

If any person to whom the work, or any portion of the work, in the improvement district has been let fails to perform the work according to the terms specified in the contract, then the cash deposit shall be forfeited for the benefit of the district and be paid into its fund; or if bond has been given by the contracting party so failing, then recovery of the damages sustained may be had by suit in the name of the payee in the bond for the use of the district, and the damage or judgment collected and paid into the fund of the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 114; Shan. Supp., § 1682a128; Code 1932, § 2943; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1517.

54-12-318. Road overseer employed for protection of district — Compensation — Discharge and employment of another.

After the main improvement in any road improvement district has been completed, the board of directors, if it deems necessary for the protection of the district, and for the proper maintenance of the efficiency of the improvement, may employ a competent person to look after and take care of the improvement.

The person so employed shall be designated road improvement overseer.

The board of directors shall contract with the overseer to perform the prescribed duties, define the duties of the overseer, and contract for the amount to be paid for the overseer's services.

The board of directors shall have the right, at any time, to discharge the overseer and employ another whenever, in its judgment, it is to the best interest of the district that it be done.

The compensation of the road overseer shall be paid out of any funds in the district, not needed for the payment of bonds and interest maturing, and other improvements that are to be made, during the year.

The payment shall be made as is provided for other payments under this chapter.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 78; Shan. Supp., § 1682a92; Code 1932, § 2906; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1518.

54-12-319. Special assessment for a special fund for maintenance — Basis.

At any time after the main improvement or improvements in any road improvement district have been completed, it shall be made to appear to the monthly county court, by the petition of the board of directors of the district, supported by satisfactory proof, that a special fund is needed for the purpose of maintaining the improvement, or for the purpose of keeping the fund effective to give full efficiency to the original purpose for which the district was created, the court shall have the power to make a special assessment, and collect a special assessment for the purpose named; but the amount assessed and collected shall not be in any one (1) year an amount in excess of ten cents (10¢) per acre on all the lands within the district.

The assessment shall be based upon the apportionment of the benefits, as made by the commissioners.

The assessment shall be collected at the same time, and in the same manner, as is provided for the collection of assessments in road improvement districts.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 120; Shan. Supp., § 1682a134; Code 1932, § 2949; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1519.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-320. Special assessment a lien inferior to general assessment — Enforcement.

The assessment shall be a lien upon the respective tracts of land upon which it is assessed, but inferior to the lien of the general assessment for the payment of bonds, interest, and administration charges.

The lien shall be enforced in the same manner as provided for the enforcements of liens in road improvement districts.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 121; Shan. Supp., § 1682a135; Code 1932, § 2950; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1520.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Special Assessments, § 9.

54-12-321. Special maintenance fund — Disbursements — Manner.

The amounts collected shall be a fund to be used for the purposes named, and shall be paid out for the purposes, on the order or warrant of the county mayor; but before payment is made, all accounts or claims for work done for the purposes named shall be approved by the board of directors of the district, by resolution or motion, spread of record on the minutes of the board.

A copy of the minutes shall be presented to the monthly county court, and approved by the court, and spread of record in the court on the road improvement record.

The payments in all respects shall be made as now provided by law for the paying out of road improvement funds.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 122; Shan. Supp., § 1682a136; Code 1932, § 2951; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1521; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-322. Injury to, damage or obstruction of road unlawful — Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person in any way to injure, damage, or obstruct the rights-of-way, roadbeds, side ditches, culverts, or bridges of the roads constructed under this chapter.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, §§ 123, 124; Shan. Supp., §§ 1682a137, 1682a138; Code 1932, §§ 2952, 2953; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1522; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Vandalism, misdemeanor, § 39-14-408.